Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2704.42
Copies of public records; exemption; exception.

Sales and use taxes shall not be imposed on the gross receipts from the sale, lease, or rental of and the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of copies of public records as defined in section 84-712.01, except those documents developed, produced, or acquired and made available for commercial sale to the general public if the price or reproduction cost of the document is not fixed by state law, rule, or regulation.

Laws 2002, LB 57, § 3.